North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 3. Procedures at the Voting Place.
§ 163-166.12.
Requirements for certain voters who register by mail.

Voting in Person. — An individual who has registered to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, and has not previously voted in an election that includes a ballot item for federal office in North Carolina, shall present to a local election official
at a voting place before voting there one of the following:

A current and valid photo identification.

A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter: a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

Voting Mail-In Absentee. — An individual who has registered to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, and has not previously voted in an election that includes a ballot item for federal office in North Carolina, in order to cast a mail-in absentee
vote, shall submit with the mailed-in absentee ballot one of the following:

A copy of a current and valid photo identification.

A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter: a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

Notation of Identification Proof. — The county board of elections shall note the type of identification proof submitted by the voter under the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section and may dispose of the tendered copy of identification
proof as soon as the type of proof is noted in the voter registration records.

Voting When Identification Numbers Do Not Match. — Regardless of whether an individual has registered by mail or by another method, if the individual has provided with the registration form a drivers license number or last four digits of a Social Security
number but the computer validation of the number as required by

G.S. 163-82.12

did not result in a match, and the number has not been otherwise validated by the board of elections, in the first election in which the individual votes that individual shall submit with the ballot the form of identification
described in subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, depending upon whether the ballot is voted in person or absentee. If that identification is provided and the board of elections does not determine that the individual
is otherwise ineligible to vote a ballot, the failure of identification numbers to match shall not prevent that individual from registering to vote and having that individual’s vote counted.

The Right to Vote Provisionally. — If an individual is required under subsection (a), (b), or (d) of this section to present identification in order to vote, but that individual does not present the required identification, that individual may vote a
provisional official ballot. If the voter is at the voting place, the voter may vote provisionally there without unnecessary delay. If the voter is voting by mail-in absentee ballot, the mailed ballot without the required identification
shall be treated as a provisional official ballot.

Exemptions. — This section does not apply to any of the following:

An individual who registers by mail and submits as part of the registration application either of the following:

A copy of a current and valid photo identification.

A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter: a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

An individual who registers by mail and submits as part of the registration application the individual’s drivers license number or at least the last four digits of the individual’s social security number where an election official matches either or both
of the numbers submitted with an existing State identification record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth contained in the submitted registration. If any individual’s number does not match, the individual shall
provide identification as required in subsection (d) of this section in the first election in which the individual votes.

An individual who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act.

An individual who is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under section 3(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act.

An individual who is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.

History.
2003-226, s. 16; 2004-127, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 21(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-381, s. 16.4; 2013-410, s. 14(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-166.12. Requirements for certain voters who register by mail.

Voting in Person. - An individual who has registered to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, and has not previously voted in an election that includes a ballot item for federal office in North Carolina, shall present to a local election official
at a voting place before voting there one of the following:

A current and valid photo identification.

A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter: a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

Voting Mail-In Absentee. - An individual who has registered to vote by mail on or after January 1, 2003, and has not previously voted in an election that includes a ballot item for federal office in North Carolina, in order to cast a mail-in absentee
vote, shall submit with the mailed-in absentee ballot one of the following: (1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification. (2) A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter: a current
utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

The Right to Vote Provisionally. - If an individual is required under subsection (a), (b), or (b2) of this section to present identification in order to vote, but that individual does not present the required identification, that individual may vote a
provisional official ballot. If the voter is at the voting place, the voter may vote provisionally there without unnecessary delay. If the voter is voting by mail-in absentee ballot, the mailed ballot without the required identification
shall be treated as a provisional official ballot.

Exemptions. - This section does not apply to any of the following:

An individual who registers by mail and submits as part of the registration application either of the following: a. A copy of a current and valid photo identification. b. A copy of one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the
voter: a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document.

An individual who registers by mail and submits as part of the registration application the individual’s drivers license number or at least the last four digits of the individual’s social security number where an election official matches either or both
of the numbers submitted with an existing State identification record bearing the same number, name, and date of birth contained in the submitted registration. If any individual’s number does not match, the individual shall
provide identification as required in subsection (b2) of this section in the first election in which the individual votes.

An individual who is entitled to vote by absentee ballot under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act.

An individual who is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under section 3(b)(2)(B)(ii) of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly and Handicapped Act. (5) An individual who is entitled to vote otherwise than in person under any other federal law.

(b1) Notation of Identification Proof. - The county board of elections shall note the type of identification proof submitted by the voter under the provisions of subsection (a) or (b) of this section and may dispose of the tendered copy of identification
proof as soon as the type of proof is noted in the voter registration records.

(b2) Voting When Identification Numbers Do Not Match. - Regardless of whether an individual has registered by mail or by another method, if the individual has provided with the registration form a drivers license number or last four digits of a Social
Security number but the computer validation of the number as required by

G.S. 163-82.12

did not result in a match, and the number has not been otherwise validated by the board of elections, in the first election in which the individual votes that individual shall submit with the ballot the form of identification
described in subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, depending upon whether the ballot is voted in person or absentee. If that identification is provided and the board of elections does not determine that the individual is
otherwise ineligible to vote a ballot, the failure of identification numbers to match shall not prevent that individual from registering to vote and having that individual’s vote counted. If the individual registers and votes under

G.S. 163-82.6

A, the identification documents required in that section, rather than those described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section, apply.

§ 163-166.13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(e), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2013-381, s. 2.1; 2014-111, s. 7; 2015-103, s. 8(a); 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(e), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-166.14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(f), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2013-381, s. 2.2; 2014-111, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(f), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-166.15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(g), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2015-103, s. 8(d); 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(g), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-166.16.
Requirement for photo identification to vote in person.

Photo Identification Required to Vote. — When a registered voter presents to vote in person, the registered voter shall produce any of the following forms of identification that contain a photograph of the registered voter:

Any of the following that is valid and unexpired, or has been expired for one year or less:

A North Carolina drivers license.

A special identification card for nonoperators issued under

G.S. 20-37.7

or other form of nontemporary identification issued by the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation.

A United States passport.

A North Carolina voter photo identification card of the registered voter issued pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.8

A.

Recodified as sub-subdivision (a)(2)c. of this section by Session Laws 2019-22, s. 1, effective June 3, 2019.

Reserved.

A student identification card issued by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, or eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3), provided that card is issued in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.17

.

An employee identification card issued by a state or local government entity, including a charter school, provided that card is issued in accordance with

G.S. 163-166.18

.

A drivers license or special identification card for nonoperators issued by another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory or commonwealth of the United States, but only if the voter’s voter registration was within 90 days of the election.

Any of the following, regardless of whether the identification contains a printed expiration or issuance date:

A military identification card issued by the United States government.

A Veterans Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for use at Veterans Administration medical facilities.

A tribal enrollment card issued by a State or federal recognized tribe.

An identification card issued by a department, agency, or entity of the United States government or this State for a government program of public assistance.

Any expired form of identification allowed in this subsection presented by a registered voter having attained the age of 65 years at the time of presentation at the voting place, provided that the identification was unexpired on the registered voter’s
sixty-fifth birthday.

Verification of Photo Identification. — After presentation of the required identification described in subsection (a) of this section, the precinct officials assigned to check registration shall compare the photograph contained on the required identification
with the person presenting to vote. The precinct official shall verify that the photograph is that of the person seeking to vote. If the precinct official disputes that the photograph contained on the required identification is
the person presenting to vote, a challenge shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures of

G.S. 163-88

. A voter shall be permitted to vote unless the judges of election present unanimously agree that the photo identification presented does not bear a reasonable resemblance to that voter.

Provisional Ballot Required Without Photo Identification. — If the registered voter cannot produce the identification as required in subsection (a) of this section, the registered voter may cast a provisional ballot that is counted only if the registered
voter brings an acceptable form of photograph identification listed in subsection (a) of this section to the county board of elections no later than the end of business on the business day prior to the canvass by the county board
of elections as provided in

G.S. 163-182.5

. The State Board shall provide the registered voter casting a provisional ballot due to failure to provide photo identification an information sheet on the deadline to return to the county board of elections to
present photo identification, and what forms of photo identification are acceptable, in order for the voter’s provisional ballot to be counted.

Exceptions. — The following exceptions are provided for a registered voter who does not produce an acceptable form of identification as required in subsection (a):

Religious Objection. — If a registered voter does not produce an acceptable form of photograph identification due to a religious objection to being photographed, the registered voter may complete an affidavit under penalty of perjury at the voting place
and affirm that the registered voter: (i) is the same individual who personally appears at the voting place; (ii) will cast the provisional ballot while voting in person; and (iii) has a religious objection to being photographed.
Upon completion of the affidavit, the registered voter may cast a provisional ballot.

Reasonable Impediment. — If a registered voter does not produce an acceptable form of photograph identification because the registered voter suffers from a reasonable impediment that prevents the registered voter from presenting photograph identification,
the registered voter may complete an affidavit under the penalty of perjury at the voting place and affirm that the registered voter: (i) is the same individual who personally appears at the voting place; (ii) will cast
the provisional ballot while voting in person; and (iii) suffers from a reasonable impediment that prevents the registered voter from presenting photograph identification. The registered voter also shall complete a reasonable
impediment declaration form provided in subsection (e) of this section, unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal law. Upon completion of the affidavit, the registered voter may cast a provisional ballot.

Natural Disaster. — If a registered voter does not produce an acceptable form of photograph identification due to being a victim of a natural disaster occurring within 100 days before election day that resulted in a disaster declaration by the President
of the United States or the Governor of this State, the registered voter may complete an affidavit under penalty of perjury at the voting place and affirm that the registered voter: (i) is the same individual who personally
appears at the voting place; (ii) will cast the provisional ballot while voting in person; and (iii) was a victim of a natural disaster occurring within 100 days before election day that resulted in a disaster declaration
by the President of the United States or the Governor of this State. Upon completion of the affidavit, the registered voter may cast a provisional ballot.

Reasonable Impediment Declaration Form. — The State Board shall adopt a reasonable impediment declaration form that, at a minimum, includes the following as separate boxes that a registered voter may check to identify the registered voter’s reasonable
impediment:

Inability to obtain photo identification due to:

Lack of transportation.

Disability or illness.

Lack of birth certificate or other underlying documents required.

Work schedule.

Family responsibilities.

Lost or stolen photo identification.

Photo identification applied for but not yet received by the registered voter voting in person.

Other reasonable impediment. If the registered voter checks the “other reasonable impediment” box, a further brief written identification of the reasonable impediment shall be required, including the option to indicate that State or federal law prohibits
listing the impediment.

County Board Review of Exceptions. — If the county board of elections determines that the registered voter voted a provisional ballot only due to the inability to provide proof of identification and the required affidavit required in subsection (d) of
this section is submitted, the county board of elections shall find that the provisional ballot is valid unless the county board has grounds to believe the affidavit is false.

Purpose. — The purpose of the identification required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section is to confirm the person presenting to vote is the registered voter on the voter registration records. Any address listed on the identification is not determinative
of a registered voter’s residence for the purpose of voting. A registered voter’s residence for the purpose of voting is determined pursuant to

G.S. 163-57

.

History.
2018-144, s. 1.2(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a); 2019-22, s. 1; 2020-17, s. 10.

§ 163-166.17.
Approval of student identification cards for voting identification.

The State Board shall approve the use of student identification cards issued by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, or eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3) for voting identification under

G.S. 163-166.16

if the following criteria are met:

The chancellor, president, or registrar of the university or college submits documentation satisfactory to the State Board that the following have been met and will not knowingly be violated with regard to student identification cards issued during the
approval period:

The identification cards that are issued by the university or college contain photographs of students obtained by the university or college or its agents or contractors, provided the photograph obtained (i) is a frontal image that includes the student’s
face and (ii) represents a clear, accurate likeness of the student to whom the identification card is issued. If the photograph is one not produced by the university or college or its agents, the university or college
shall certify in detail the process used by the university or college to ensure the photograph is that of the student to whom the identification card is issued and shall certify that the process is designed to confirm
the identity of the student to whom the identification card is issued.

The identification cards are issued after an enrollment or other process that includes one or more methods of confirming the identity of the student using information that may include, but are not limited to, the social security number, citizenship status,
and birthdate of the student.

Access to the equipment for producing the identification cards is restricted through security measures.

Misuse of the equipment for producing the identification cards would be grounds for student discipline or termination of an employee.

University or college officials would report any misuse of student identification card equipment they have knowledge of to law enforcement if

G.S. 163-82.8

(19) was potentially violated.

The cards issued by the university or college on or after January 1, 2021, contain a date of expiration.

The university or college will provide copies of student identification cards to the State Board to assist with training purposes.

The college or university will provide to students who are issued the student identification card a copy of, or an electronic link to, a document developed by the State Board that details the requirements related to identification for voting; the requirements
to vote absentee, early, or on election day; a description of voting by provisional ballot; and the availability of a free North Carolina voter photo identification card pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.8

A to rural, military, veteran, elderly, underserved, minority, or other communities as determined by local needs; and the requirements of North Carolina residency to vote, including applicable
intent requirements of North Carolina law, and the penalty for voting in multiple states.

The university or college complies with any other reasonable security measures determined by the State Board to be necessary for the protection and security of the student identification process.

The State Board shall establish a schedule for such submissions and approvals. The State Board shall permit a university or college with no changes to the prior election cycle’s approval to submit a statement indicating no changes have been made by the
university or college. When the State Board approves for use the student identification cards issued by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, a community college, as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, or eligible private postsecondary institution as defined in G.S. 116-280(3), for voting identification purposes under

G.S. 163-166.16

, such approval shall be valid for the period from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through December 31 of the next even-numbered year.

The State Board shall produce a list of participating universities and colleges every two years. The list shall be published on the State Board’s Web site and distributed to every county board of elections. The State Board shall publish sample student
identification cards for each participating university and college.

If a participating college or university with a student identification card approved for use by the State Board as provided in subsection (b) of this section changes the design of the student identification card, that college or university shall provide
copies of the new design of the student identification cards to the State Board to assist with training purposes.

History.
2018-144, s. 1.2(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a); 2019-22, s. 2.

§ 163-166.18.
Approval of employee identification cards for voting identification.

The State Board shall approve the use of employee identification cards issued by a state or local government entity, including a charter school, for voting identification under

G.S. 163-166.16

if the following criteria are met:

The head elected official or lead human resources employee of the state or local government entity or charter school submits documentation satisfactory to the State Board that the following true have been met and will not knowingly be violated with regard
to employee identification cards issued during the approval period:

The identification cards that are issued by the state or local government entity or charter school contain photographs of the employees obtained by the state or local government entity or charter school employing entity or its agents or contractors, provided
the photograph obtained (i) is a frontal image that includes the employee’s face and (ii) represents a clear, accurate likeness of the employee to whom the identification card is issued. If the photograph is one
not produced by the state or local government entity or charter school, the state or local government entity or charter school shall certify in detail the process used by the state or local government entity or
charter school to ensure the photograph is that of the employee to whom the identification card is issued and shall certify that the process is designed to confirm the identity of the employee to whom the identification
card is issued.

The identification cards are issued after an employment application or other process that includes one or more methods of confirming the identity of the employee using information that include, but are not limited to, the social security number, citizenship
status, and birthdate of the employee.

Access to the equipment for producing the identification cards is restricted through security measures.

Misuse of the equipment for producing the identification cards would be grounds for termination of an employee.

State or local or charter school officials would report any misuse of identification card equipment they have knowledge of to law enforcement if G.S. 163-275(19) was potentially violated.

The cards issued by the state or local government entity or charter school on or after January 1, 2021, contain a date of expiration.

The state or local government entity or charter school will provide copies of employee identification cards to the State Board to assist with training purposes.

The state or local government entity complies with any other reasonable security measures determined by the State Board to be necessary for the protection and security of the employee identification process.

The State Board shall establish a schedule for such submissions and approvals. The State Board shall permit a State or local government entity or charter school with no changes to the prior election cycle’s approval to submit a statement indicating no
changes have been made by the State or local government entity or charter school. When the State Board approves for use the employee identification cards issued by a state or local government entity, including a charter school,
for voting identification under

G.S. 163-166.16

, such approval shall be valid for the period from January 1 of an odd-numbered year through December 31 of the next even-numbered year.

The State Board shall produce a list of participating employing entities every two years. The list shall be published on the State Board’s Web site and distributed to every county board of elections. The State Board shall publish sample employee identification
cards for each participating State or local government entity or charter school.

History.
2018-144, s. 1.2(c); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a); 2019-22, s. 3.

§ 163-167.

Reserved for future codification purposes.